Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-314
False imprisonment in the first degree; penalty.

(1) A person commits false imprisonment in the first degree if he or she knowingly restrains or abducts another person (a) under terrorizing circumstances or under circumstances which expose the person to the risk of serious bodily injury; or (b) with intent to hold him or her in a condition of involuntary servitude.

(2) False imprisonment in the first degree is a Class IIIA felony.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 29;

Laws 1997, LB 364, § 5.

Registration of sex offenders, see sections 29-4001 to 29-4014.

Sufficient evidence was presented from which a jury could reasonably infer that the defendant, either alone or while aiding and abetting a codefendant, intended to restrain the victim under terrorizing circumstances which exposed her to the risk of serious bodily injury. State v. Nissen, 252 Neb. 51, 560 N.W.2d 157 (1997).

Sections 28-313 and 28-314 define separate offenses. State v. Miller, 216 Neb. 72, 341 N.W.2d 915 (1983).

Pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the offense of first degree false imprisonment requires that the knowing restraint of another person be either under terrorizing circumstances, under circumstances which expose the person to the risk of serious bodily injury, or with the intent to hold the individual in a condition of involuntary servitude. None of these conditions can be accomplished without restraining the individual without legal authority. State v. Brownell, 11 Neb. App. 68, 644 N.W.2d 166 (2002).

Pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the restraint required to commit the offense of first degree false imprisonment must necessarily be without legal authority. State v. Brownell, 11 Neb. App. 68, 644 N.W.2d 166 (2002).

Second degree false imprisonment is a lesser-included offense of first degree false imprisonment. State v. Brownell, 11 Neb. App. 68, 644 N.W.2d 166 (2002).

First degree false imprisonment is not a lesser-included offense of kidnapping. State v. Newman, 5 Neb. App. 291, 559 N.W.2d 764 (1997).